Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 40
BOISE STATE UNIVERSITY

Section.

33-4001. Boise State University established — Standards — Professional-technical programs.

The college now known as Boise state college and previously operated and conducted by Boise community college district in Ada County, Idaho, known as Boise college, shall be established in the city of Boise, Idaho, as an institution of higher education of the state of Idaho, for the purpose of giving instruction in college courses in sciences, arts and literature, professional, technical and other courses of higher education, such courses being those that are usually included in colleges and universities leading to the granting of appropriate collegiate degrees, said college to be known as Boise State University. The standards of the courses and departments maintained in said university shall be at least equal to, or on a parity with those maintained in other similar colleges and universities in Idaho and other states. All programs in the professional-technical departments, including terminal programs now established and maintained, may be continued and such additional professional-technical and terminal programs may be added as the needs of the students attending such university taking professional-technical and terminal programs shall warrant, and the appropriate certificate for completion thereof shall be granted. The courses offered and degrees granted at said university shall be determined by the board of trustees.

33-4002. State board of education as a succeeding board of trustees.

The general supervision, government and control of said Boise state university shall be vested in the state board of education which shall act as the board of trustees of said university.

33-4003. Means and methods to effectuate transition — Assumption of liabilities — Exception.

The board of trustees of Boise Junior College District are hereby empowered, authorized and directed to convey and assign all property rights, contracts and other tangible and intangible assets of the district, and/or college to the state board of education as a succeeding board of trustees of said college provided in Section 2 [33-4002, Idaho Code,] of this act. The state board of education and the board of trustees of Boise Junior College District are hereby authorized and directed to confer between themselves and with third parties as may be necessary, to determine and agree upon appropriate means and methods to effectuate the orderly transfer of Boise College on January 1, 1969, as herein provided and each of said boards are hereby authorized and directed to have prepared and execute all instruments and documents necessary therefor. The respective boards shall, immediately after the passage of this act confer, cooperate and agree upon all contracts and other matters which will or may carry over beyond January 1, 1969 and each board is authorized to execute any and all documents, agreements, employment contracts and do all things necessary, both before and after January 1, 1969 to effectuate the transition of said college herein provided with the least interference and disruption of the educational processes of said college. On and after January 1, 1969 the state board of education as the board of trustees shall assume the liabilities and responsibilities of Boise Junior College District excepting, however, the liabilities of the district for the payment of principal and interest of general obligation bonds theretofore issued by the district.

33-4004. Assumption of construction bonds by state board of education.

On or after January 1, 1969, Boise Junior College Housing Commission and the state board of education shall negotiate and agree with third persons holding revenue bonds issued by Boise Junior College Housing Commission for the construction of dormitory, residence and student union facilities for the assumption of said bonds by the state board of education in such manner as may be agreeable and lawful. The state board of education is hereby authorized, if required to effectuate this act, to issue its bonds for the refunding of the bonds of Boise Junior College Housing Commission issued prior to January 1, 1969, in the same manner that it may refund bonds issued by it as provided in the Educational Institutions Act of 1935, being Chapter 38 of Title 33, Idaho Code.

33-4005. Powers and duties of the board of trustees.

The board of trustees of said college upon proper conveyance thereof, shall have all rights and title to real estate and personal property of said college, control over all buildings, power to elect presidents and contract with faculty of said college, supervise students and all powers and duties with reference to said college as are now granted by the statutes of the state of Idaho to the board of regents of the University of Idaho, and the board of trustees of Idaho State University as set forth in Chapters 28, 29, 30, 36, 37 and 38 of Title 33, Idaho Code, as the same may hereafter be amended, are fully empowered to exercise said powers and assume such duties with relation to said college from and after January 1, 1969, unless otherwise specifically authorized herein to the exercise of said powers prior to said date.

33-4006. Junior college district to remain until all bonds retired

Board of trustees to retain authority required to effectuate purpose of act. [Repealed.]

33-4007. Name change.

Whenever the name of Boise college or Boise state college shall appear in any statute, such statute is hereby amended to read Boise state university as fully and completely as though said name in said statute was specifically amended herein, and all such statutes shall be construed to refer to and mean Boise state university.